Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [5.60] YOUTH CIVIC ENGAGEMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Short title. new text end new text begin This section may be cited as the "Youth Civic Engagement Act." new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Youth" means individuals aged 14 to 24. new text end new text begin (c) "Civic engagement" means voting, volunteering, participating in community service, and engaging in advocacy or public decision-making. new text end new text begin (d) "Eligible organization" means a school, community center, nonprofit organization, or government agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Findings and purpose. new text end new text begin (a) The Minnesota legislature finds that: new text end new text begin (1) active civic engagement is essential to a healthy democracy; new text end new text begin (2) youth are underrepresented in civic and political processes despite their growing potential to drive social change; new text end new text begin (3) according to the National Assessment of Educational Progress, only about 23 percent of Minnesota high school graduates are considered proficient in civics, indicating that a majority of students, approximately 77 percent, fail to meet basic civics standards upon graduation; new text end new text begin (4) early education and engagement in civic activities increase the likelihood of sustained involvement throughout adulthood; new text end new text begin (5) barriers such as lack of education, mentorship, and resources hinder youth from fully participating in democratic processes; new text end new text begin (6) research shows that students who participate in service-learning or other civic activities are more likely to vote and engage in community projects as adults; new text end new text begin (7) youth civic engagement fosters critical thinking, leadership skills, and a sense of responsibility toward the community; new text end new text begin (8) programs such as mock elections, debate clubs, and student government have demonstrated measurable improvements in students' understanding of civic processes and their motivation to participate; and new text end new text begin (9) lack of access to transportation and information often disproportionately affects marginalized youth, further limiting their civic engagement opportunities. new text end new text begin (b) The purpose of the Youth Civic Engagement Act is to: new text end new text begin (1) encourage civic engagement among youth; new text end new text begin (2) provide resources and opportunities for leadership development and community involvement; new text end new text begin (3) partner with educational institutions, local governments, and nonprofit organizations to establish youth-focused civic programs; and new text end new text begin (4) address barriers to youth participation, ensuring equitable access to civic resources and opportunities. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grant program. new text end new text begin (a) The youth civic engagement initiative grant program is established to promote youth civic engagement. The secretary of state must establish an application form and process to award grants to eligible organizations. At a minimum, the application must include: new text end new text begin (1) proposed programming and expected outcomes; new text end new text begin (2) a budget proposal identifying resource needs; new text end new text begin (3) plans to promote inclusivity and equitable access; and new text end new text begin (4) strategies for measuring the impact of funded initiatives. new text end new text begin (b) Grant funds may be used for the following purposes: new text end new text begin (1) civic education curricula for schools; new text end new text begin (2) supporting youth-led civic projects addressing local issues; new text end new text begin (3) hosting civic engagement events, including Youth Civic Engagement Day events; new text end new text begin (4) providing stipends for youth participating in civic engagement activities; new text end new text begin (5) establishing mentorship programs pairing youth with civic leaders; new text end new text begin (6) creating outreach programs to engage rural and underserved communities; new text end new text begin (7) developing digital platforms and tools to facilitate virtual civic participation and education; and new text end new text begin (8) to allocate funds directly to organizations such as Youth Civic Leaders to implement statewide civic engagement programs. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [10.598] YOUTH CIVIC ENGAGEMENT DAY. new text end new text begin The third Friday in October of each year is designated Youth Civic Engagement Day in Minnesota. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; YOUTH CIVIC ENGAGEMENT.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the secretary of state to make grants for youth civic engagement activities under Minnesota Statutes, section 5.60, subdivision 4. new text end